District of Columbia statutes.
24-231.07

Repealed

Prison Industries Joint Venture Advisory Board.

Repealed.

May 8, 1996, D.C. Law 11-117, § 8, 43 DCR 1179
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 401(h), 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 24-458.7.